West Virginia, session 2025, SB932.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR; POWERS; FUNCTIONS; DUTIES; COMPENSATION. §4-2-13. Combining the offices of the Legislative Auditor and the State Auditor. Effective July 1, 2025, the offices of the Legislative Auditor and the State Auditor shall be combined into one office. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Legislative Auditor as set forth throughout this article shall be transferred to the office of the State Auditor.